en: Cooked calf liver
fr: Foie de veau cuit
hr: kuhana teleća jetra
it: fegato di vitello cotto

en: caribou
la: Rangifer tarandus

en: cow
bg: крава
ca: vaca
da: ko
de: Kuh
es: vaca
fr: Vache
hr: krava
nl: rund, koe
pt: Vaca
sv: ko

en: beef bones
de: Rinderknochen
es: huesos de carne vacuna
fi: naudan luut, naudan lihaisat luut
fr: os de boeuf
hr: goveđe kosti
it: ossa di manzo
sv: ben av nöt, köttiga ben av nöt

en: oxtail
de: Ochsenschwanz
es: rabo vacuno
hr: goveđi rep
it: coda di bue

en: beef tripe
de: Rinderkutteln, Rinder-Kutteln
es: callos de vacuno
hr: goveđi tripice
it: trippa di manzo
pl: flaki wołowe, żołądki wołowe

en: beef lung
de: Rinderlunge
it: polmone di manzo

en: beef udder
de: Rindereuter
it: mammella di manzo

en: bresaola
de: Bresaola
fr: bresaola
hr: bresaola
it: bresaola

en: chuck steak
ca: filet de llonzes i coll
de: chuck
fi: naudan etuselkä
fr: paleron
hr: chuck odrezak
id: leher sapi
it: bistecca di Chuck
sv: högrev, högrev av nötkött

en: lamb
an: Corder
bg: агне
br: Oan
ca: anyell
cy: Oen
de: Lamm
eo: ŝafido
es: cordero
et: Tall
eu: Arkume
fi: karitsa
fr: agneau
gd: Uan
gl: Año
hr: janjetina
hu: bárány
it: agnello
ja: ラム
ky: Козу
lv: jērs
nb: lam
nl: lam
pl: Jagnię
pt: cordeiro
qu: Achkash
ru: ягнёнок

en: lamb meat
bg: агнешко месо
ca: carn de xai
cs: jehněčí maso
da: lammekød
de: Lammfleisch
es: carne de cordero
fi: karitsanliha
fr: viande d'agneau
hr: meso janjetine
hu: bárányhús
it: carne di agnello
nl: lamsvlees
nn: lammekjøtt
sv: Lammkött

en: lamb cutlet
fr: côtelette d'agneau, côtelettes d'agneau, côte d'agneau, côtes d'agneau
hr: janjeći kotlet
it: costoletta di agnello

en: Lamb on skewer
fr: Brochette d'agneau
hr: janjetina na ražnju
it: agnello allo spiedo

en: Grilled lamb cutlet
fr: Côtelette d'agneau grillée
hr: janjeći kotlet na žaru
it: cotoletta d'agnello alla griglia

en: lamb shoulders
fr: Epaule d'agneau
hr: janjeće plećke
it: spalle di agnello

en: Roasted lamb shoulders, baked lamb shoulders
fr: Epaule rôtie d'agneau, Epaule d'agneau cuite au four
hr: pečene janjeće plećke
it: spalle di agnello arrosto

en: Roasted lean lamb shoulder, Baked lean lamb shoulder
fr: Epaule d'agneau maigre rôtie, Epaule d'agneau maigre cuite au four
hr: pečena nemasna janjeća lopatica
it: spalla di agnello magra arrosto

en: british lamb
de: britisches Lamm
hr: britanska janjetina
it: agnello britannico

en: lamb gut
es: tripa nayural de cordero
hr: janjeća iznutrica
it: budello di agnello